Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1608
Health insurance contract; extension of special benefits; payment.

The group health insurance contract or contracts may permit the extension of special benefits, such as insurance over and above that provided by the basic coverage specified in section 84-1605, dental health insurance, disability insurance, accidental death and dismemberment benefits, disability income replacement benefits, and the extension of coverage to dependents. Any coverage under this section may be borne solely by the employee.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 6;

Laws 1974, LB 789, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 244, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 632, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 115, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1625.